Utah statutes.
57-1-34.   Sale of trust property by trustee -- Foreclosure of trust deed -- Limitation of actions.

The trustee's sale of property under a trust deed shall be made, or an action to foreclose a trust deed as provided by law for the foreclosure of mortgages on real property shall be commenced, within the period prescribed by law for the commencement of an action on the obligation secured by the trust deed.

